Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6291.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 70A.105.110 and 2019 c 442 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The local board of health shall ensure that individuals who conduct inspections of on-site wastewater treatment systems as defined in RCW 18.210.010 or who otherwise conduct reviews of such systems are qualified in the technology and application of on-site sewage treatment principles. A certificate of competency issued by the state board of registration for professional engineers and land surveyors is adequate demonstration that an individual is competent in the engineering aspects of on-site wastewater treatment system technology.(2) A local board of health may allow noncertified individuals to review designs of, and conduct inspections of, on-site wastewater treatment systems ((for a maximum of two years after the date of hire, if a certified individual reviews or supervises the work during that time)), as defined in RCW 18.210.010, pursuant to this section under the supervision of a certified individual. Such supervised practice may continue for a maximum of four years after the date of hire.--- END ---